Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6169YC (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 422.16, subsection 2, paragraph d, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 d. For the purposes of this subsection , state income 3 tax shall be withheld on winnings in excess of six hundred 4 dollars derived from gambling activities authorized under 5 chapter 99B or 99G . State income tax shall be withheld on 6 winnings in excess of one thousand dollars from gambling 7 activities authorized under chapter 99D . State income tax 8 shall be withheld on winnings in excess of one thousand two 9 hundred dollars derived from slot machines authorized under 10 chapter 99F if the winnings are required to be reported on an 11 information return for federal purposes . State income tax 12 shall be withheld on winnings from sports wagering authorized 13 under chapter 99F whenever federal income tax is required to be 14 withheld from the same winnings in accordance with the Internal 15 Revenue Code. 16 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 17 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 18